District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-804

Licensing procedure.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 5, 44 DCR 140
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-188, § 2(b), 47 DCR 7075
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 20, 50 DCR 260
1981 Ed., § 35-1324.